Maine, session 132, LD2087.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §1524-C, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 284, §12, is amended
to read:
No more than one conditional license may be issued to a person who has completed
the education requirements of this chapter. A conditional license may be held no more than
4 5 years, except that a 5th 6th year may be granted by the director upon demonstration of
extreme hardship.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §1524-C, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 48, §5, is
amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) An associate degree or higher in any field, including an associate degree or
higher in American Sign Language, American Sign Language interpreting or deaf
studies, from an accredited college or university; or
Page 1 - 132LR2814(03)

Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §1525-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Emergencies. This chapter does not apply to a person providing communication
assistance during an emergency. For purposes of this subsection, "emergency" means a
determination by the director, after consultation with the Commissioner of Professional and
Financial Regulation, that a serious, unexpected and potentially dangerous situation is
occurring, or did occur, that requires an immediate need for interpreting services to be
provided as part of an emergency response.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2814(03)